Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-223
Fish, when used as a noun, defined.

Fish, when used as a noun, means a cold-blooded, vertebrate animal, typically covered with scales, which breathes by gills, swims by body motion using fins for maneuvering, and is dependent upon water as a medium in which to live.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 33.